Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.690.020

Superintendent as "designated state official," compact administrator—Professional educator standards board to approve text of contracts.

The "designated state official" for this state under Article II of RCW 28A.690.010 shall be the superintendent of public instruction, who shall be the compact administrator and who shall have power to adopt rules to carry out the terms of this compact. The superintendent of public instruction shall enter into contracts pursuant to Article III of the Agreement only with the approval of the specific text thereof by the professional educator standards board.

[ 2006 c 263 s 818; 1990 c 33 s 546; 1969 ex.s. c 283 s 5. Formerly RCW 28A.93.020, 28.93.020.]

NOTES:

Findings—Purpose—Part headings not law—2006 c 263: See notes following RCW 28A.150.230.

Severability—1969 ex.s. c 283: See note following RCW 28A.150.050.